New Jersey, session 221, A4486.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2023, c.300 (C.52:32-31.17) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  (1)  The department shall establish contracting agency procurement goals of at least 30 percent for contracting with qualified business enterprises in the awarding of contracts.  These goals may, where appropriate, be attained by the direct designation of prime contracts for qualified business enterprises or by subcontracting, and in accordance with and supported by available data and information.  Each contracting agency shall make a good faith effort to attain the goals established in this section. (2)   The department shall develop a process for evaluating and adjusting goals to determine what adjustments are necessary to achieve participation goals. b.    Each contracting agency shall annually develop, in consultation with the department, a plan for achieving its qualified business enterprise goals. (cf: P.L.2023, c.300, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.